Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 743A.145 is amended to read:
743A.145. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Device” means:
(A) An orthotic device.
(B) A prosthetic device.
[(a)] (b) “Orthotic  device” means a rigid or semirigid device supporting a weak or deformed leg,
foot, arm, hand,  back or neck, or restricting or eliminating motion in a diseased or injured leg, foot,
arm, hand, back or neck.
[(b)] (c)  “Prosthetic device” means an artificial limb device or appliance  designed to replace in
whole or in part an arm or a leg.
(2) All  individual and group health insurance policies providing coverage for the expenses of
hospital, medical or  surgical services or supplies shall provide coverage for [ prosthetic and
orthotic] devices . [ that are medically  necessary to restore or maintain the ability to complete activities
of daily living or essential job-related activities and that are not  solely for comfort or convenience. ] The
coverage required by this subsection includes :
(a) Devices that are determined to be medically necessary to restore or maintain  the
ability to complete activities of daily living or essential job-related activities and  that are not
solely for comfort or convenience.
(b) All services and supplies medically necessary for  the effective use of a [ prosthetic or
orthotic] device, including design  formulation, fabrication, material and component selection, meas-
urements, fittings, static and dynamic alignments and patient instruction in the use of the device.
(c) Replacement of a device or any part of a device,  if the replacement is determined to
be medically necessary, based on:
(A) A change in the physiological condition of the insured;
(B) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or part of the device; or
(C) The device, or a part of the device, requiring repair and the cost of the repair  would
be more than 60 percent of the cost  of the replacement device or replacement part of the
device.
Enrolled Senate Bill 699 (SB 699-A) Page 1
(d) Repair of a device or any part of a device, if the repair is determined to  be medically
necessary, based on:
(A) A change in the physiological condition of the insured; or
(B) A change in the condition of the device or part of the device.
(e) Devices that are determined to be medically necessary and the most appropriate
model that meets the medical needs  of the insured for purposes of performing physical ac-
tivities, including but not limited to running, biking, swimming and strength  training, and
that maximizes the insured’s whole-body health, including lower and upper limb function.
(3) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  adopt and annually
update rules listing the [ prosthetic and orthotic ] devices covered under this section. The list shall
be no more restrictive than the list of [ prosthetic and orthotic ] devices and supplies in the Medicare
fee schedule for Durable Medical Equipment, Prosthetics, Orthotics and Supplies,  but only to the
extent consistent with this section.
(4) The coverage required by subsection (2) of this section may be made subject to, and no more
restrictive than, the provisions of a health insurance policy that apply to other  benefits under the
policy.
[(5) The coverage required by subsection  (2) of this section shall include any repair or replacement
of a prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined medically necessary to restore or  maintain the
ability to complete activities of  daily living or essential job-related activities and that is not solely for
comfort or convenience. ]
[(6)] (5) If the coverage under subsection (2) of  this section is provided through a managed care
organization, the insured shall have access  to medically necessary clinical care and to [ prosthetic
and orthotic ] devices and technology from  not fewer than two distinct Oregon prosthetic and
orthotic providers in the managed care organization’s provider network.
(6) An individual or group health plan may not deny coverage for a prosthetic  or orthotic
benefit for an insured with limb loss, impairment or absence to restore or maintain the
ability to perform  a physical activity if a benefit would be covered for medical or surgical
intervention for a  person without limb loss, impairment or absence to restore or maintain
the ability to perform the same physical activity.
(7) For coverage described in subsection (2)(c)  of this section, an insurer may require
confirmation from the prescribing health care provider that the coverage is medically  nec-
essary if the device, or any part of  the device, requires replacement and is less than three
years old.
[(7)] (8) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
(9) The coverage requirements described in subsections (2)(e), (6) and (7) of this section
do not apply to  a health benefit plan offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board, unless the plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit
Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board elect to provide the coverage and  provide no-
tice to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services in the form and manner de-
scribed by the department by rule.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 743A.145 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to
policies or certificates of health insurance issued, renewed or extended on or after  January
1, 2026.
Enrolled Senate Bill 699 (SB 699-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 699 (SB 699-A) Page 3